Utah statutes.
53-2-106.   Expenditures authorized by "state of emergency" declaration.

(1) (a)  The director may use funds authorized under Title 63K, Chapter 4, Disaster Response and Recovery Act, to provide:

(i)  transportation to and from the disaster scene;

(ii)  accommodations at the disaster scene for prolonged incidents; and

(iii)  emergency purchase of response equipment and supplies in direct support of a disaster.

(b)  The commissioner may authorize the use of funds accrued under Title 63K, Chapter 2, Energy Emergency Powers of the Governor Act, only if the governor declares a state of emergency as provided in Title 63K, Chapter 4, Disaster Response and Recovery Act.

(2)  These funds may not be allocated to a political subdivision unless the political subdivision has demonstrated that it is beyond its capability to respond to the disaster and that no other resources are available in sufficient amount to meet the disaster.



Amended by Chapter 340, 2011 General Session

